Illinois, session 104th, SB2046.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $350,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund 6to the Department of Transportation for the construction, land 7acquisition, and any other required infrastructure changes for 8a new interchange at Minooka Road on I-80 to accommodate 9current and expected increases to traffic volume. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112025.